Utah statutes.
78B-6-1303.   Lis pendens -- Notice.
(1)  Either party to an action affecting the title to, or the right of
possession of, real property may file a notice of the pendency of the action
with the county recorder in the county where the property or any portion of
the property is located.
(2)  The notice shall contain:
(a)  the names of the parties;
(b)  the object of the action or defense; and
(c)  a description of the property affected in that county.
(3)  From the time of filing the notice, a purchaser or encumbrancer of the
property who may be affected by the action is considered to have constructive
notice of the pendency of the action.
